Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 5. Director of the State Department of Audit

Cross references. —

As to the state banking commissioners, see §

13-1-601

.

§§ 9-1-501 and 9-1-502.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 240, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 155, §§ 1, 3, 4 and 26, related to the state examiner.

§ 9-1-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 5; 1983, ch. 171, § 3.

Cross references. —

As to offenses by public officials, see §

6-5-101

et seq.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 27, related to prohibition against receiving extra compensation.

§ 9-1-504.
Seal of office; adoption; effect of seal.

With the approval of the governor, the director of the state department of audit shall adopt a seal and shall file an impression of the seal with the secretary of state. Every certificate, assignment and conveyance executed by the director pursuant to law and sealed with the seal of his office shall be received as evidence and recorded in the proper recording offices in the same manner as a deed regularly acknowledged as required by law.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 10; R.S. 1931, § 109-510; C.S. 1945, § 18-810; W.S. 1957, § 9-93; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-406

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 9-1-505.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 240, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 2, related to vacancies in the office of state examiner.

§ 9-1-506.
Authority to issue subpoenas and administer oaths.

In the performance of his duties, the director of the state department of audit may issue subpoenas, administer oaths and enforce obedience of subpoenas and oaths in the same manner as courts of law in this state.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 9; R.S. 1931, § 109-509; C.S. 1945, § 18-809; W.S. 1957, § 9-97; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-409

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to oaths generally, see §§

1-2-101

to

1-2-103

.

§ 9-1-507.
Examination of books of state institutions, agencies and certain districts and entities; independent audit authorized; guidelines.

The director of the state department of audit shall:

Supervise the books, financial accounts and financial records of all state agencies and institutions, counties, school districts and municipalities within the state;

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 75, § 2.

Require state institutions, state agencies, the entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c), special districts and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) and incorporated cities and towns with a population of less than four thousand (4,000) inhabitants to file with the department such reports of the books and accounts of the institution, agency, district or entity as the director deems necessary. The director shall promulgate rules under which special districts and entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) shall prepare and file an annual report of their books and records with the department of audit. These rules shall apply to special districts which are subject to administration by the courts as provided in subsection (e) of this section. These rules shall provide for different levels of oversight, at the expense of the district, depending upon the higher of the total revenues received or expenditures made by the district during the fiscal year under review subject to the following limitations:

At least one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) — an audit by a certified public accountant shall be required;

At least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) — requirements shall be greater than those in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph but less than those in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The rules shall provide for more stringent oversight requirements for districts with higher total revenues within this range than the requirements for districts with lower total revenues within this range;

Less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) but more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) — the only requirements shall be a proof of cash procedure conducted by an independent third party with a certification from two (2) authorized representatives of the district that the proof of cash procedure was performed by the independent third party in accordance with procedures required by the director and that to the best of their knowledge the financial information used was complete and accurate;

Twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or less — the only requirement shall be the annual report of district revenues, expenses and ending cash balance.

Require corrections of faults or erroneous systems of accounting and when necessary instruct county and municipal officers in the proper mode of keeping accounts;

Perform an audit or specified procedures of any books and records of any state institution, state agency, incorporated city or town with a population of less than four thousand (4,000) inhabitants or any special district or entity described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) whenever the director feels the audit or procedures are necessary. In lieu of performing such audit or procedures, the director may accept an audit or specified procedures performed by a certified public accountant. Specified procedures shall include procedures conducted under one (1) of the following standards:

Current government audit standards issued by the United States comptroller general;

Generally accepted principles and quality standards formally approved by the Association of Inspectors General;

Standards recognized by the Institute of Internal Auditors; or

Standards recognized by the Association of Certified Fraud Examiners.

Conduct performance measure reviews based on the standards developed in W.S. 28-1-115(a)(ii)(A). The director shall determine the means to be used to verify and validate the performance measures. The results of the reviews shall be reported to the agency head, governor and secretary of state;

Require counties, cities, towns and special districts and entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) in this state to report to the department revenues received and expenditures made each fiscal year. The reports shall be made not later than September 30 for the prior fiscal year. The format of the reports required by this paragraph shall be established by the department of audit by rule. Not later than December 31 of each year, the department shall provide a copy of the report on special districts and entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) that receive funding from a municipality as defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) under this paragraph to the board of county commissioners for each special district and other entity located in that county;

Beginning 2018, require each special district and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) in this state, no matter how formed, except districts created by and subject to administration by the courts, to report to the department and to the county clerk of the county where the special district or other specified entity is located its proposed budget for the next fiscal year. If a special district or other specified entity operates in multiple counties, the special district or other specified entity may post the proposed budget conspicuously on its website or file the proposed budget with each county clerk of the counties in which the special district or other specified entity operates. The report or posting shall be made not later than June 1 of each year. The format of the reports required by this paragraph shall be established by the department of audit by rule no later than December 31, 2017;

In lieu of the rules described in subparagraphs (iii)(A) through (D) of this subsection, fire protection and water and sewer districts shall be required to comply with the rules to provide for different levels of oversight as follows:

At least one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) – an audit by a certified public accountant shall be required;

At least one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) but less than one million dollars ($1,000,000.00) – requirements shall be greater than those in subparagraph (C) of this paragraph but less than those in subparagraph (A) of this paragraph. The rules shall provide for more stringent oversight requirements for districts with higher total revenues within this range than the requirements for districts with lower total revenues within this range;

Less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000.00) but more than twenty–five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) – the only requirements shall be a proof of cash procedure conducted by an independent third party with a certification from two (2) authorized representatives of the district that the proof of cash procedure was performed by the independent third party in accordance with procedures required by the director and that to the best of their knowledge the financial information used was complete and accurate;

Twenty–five thousand dollars ($25,000.00) or less — the only requirement shall be the annual report of district revenues, expenses and ending cash balance.

Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 75, § 2.

Audit procedures performed on all state agencies, institutions and municipalities as defined in W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) within the state shall be performed in accordance with current government audit standards issued by the United States comptroller general and within the standards for audit of governmental units as promulgated by the American Institute of Certified Public Accountants.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 26, § 2.

The director may waive the oversight requirements of paragraph (a)(iii) of this section for special districts created by and subject to administration by the courts, if the district provides to the director:

An annual written request for a waiver within thirty (30) days after the required annual filing of financial information with the court;

A copy, certified by the court, of the receipts and disbursements of the district for the fiscal year for which the waiver is requested;

A copy of the annual budget with the court authorized assessments for the year following the year for which the waiver is requested;

Other information as the director may reasonably require.

No state agency or board shall impose requirements for audit procedures to be performed upon any public entity described in subsection (c) of this section which exceed the requirements of subsection (c) of this section unless those requirements have been authorized through rules or regulations promulgated by the director of the department of audit and the state agency or board provides funding for the additional audit requirements.

No state agency or board shall require of any recipient of grants or funds, as a condition of receiving the grant or funds, any audit procedures to be performed which exceed the requirements in subsection (c) of this section unless the state agency or board provides funding for the additional audit requirements through a specific amount in the grant of funds, or unless the requirements are specifically authorized by statute. All state agencies and boards shall verify that all applicants and recipients of state grants or loans are in compliance with the applicable reporting requirement under paragraph (a)(vii) of this section as a condition of receiving the grant or loan. For purposes of this section, a state grant or loan shall not be those grants or loans which include any federal funds or monies paid in consideration for services rendered to the state agency or board.

The department of audit shall have authority to promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the provisions of the audit procedures authorized by this section including, unless otherwise provided, setting the dollar limits at which audits authorized under subsections (f) and (g) of this section are to be performed for governmental entities in this state and any recipient of state funds.

The director of the department of audit shall certify:

To the state treasurer and state auditor by October 5 of each year, a list of counties, cities and towns that failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The state treasurer shall withhold the annual distribution, which would otherwise be made under W.S.

9-2-1014

.1, to any county, city or town failing to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The withheld distribution shall be retained in the budget reserve account until the director of the department of audit certifies that the county, city or town has filed the required report. The state auditor shall immediately notify all state agencies and boards of every county, city or town that failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. Upon receipt of notification by the state auditor pursuant to this paragraph, a state agency or board shall withhold state grant and loan payments to every noncompliant county, city or town for the period after October 15 until further notice from the state auditor that a noncompliant county, city or town has come into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The department of audit shall certify to the state auditor when a county, city or town comes into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The state auditor shall immediately notify all state agencies and boards of every county, city or town that has come into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. Any withheld state grant or loan payments shall be retained by the state agency or board in the account from which the disbursement would be made until the state agency or board receives notification from the state auditor that the county, city or town is in compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section, or as otherwise provided by law;

To the board of county commissioners and to the special district or entity described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) that receives funding from a municipality as defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) by October 5 of each year any special district or other entity in the county, no matter how formed, that failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. If, by November 30 of that same year, the district or other entity has failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section, the director of the department of audit shall file notice with the county commissioners, the county treasurer and the county clerk. The county commissioners shall place a public notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the county indicating the special district or other entity is in danger of being dissolved due to failure to comply with the legal reporting requirements. The county commissioners shall assess the special district or other entity the cost of the public notice. The county treasurer shall withhold any further distribution of money to the district until the department certifies to the county treasurer that the district or other entity has complied with all reporting requirements. If the special district or other entity fails to file the required report on or before December 30 of that same year, the county commissioners shall seek to dissolve the special district or other entity in accordance with the process described by W.S.

22-29-401

et seq. This paragraph shall apply in addition to any other provision for dissolution in the principal act for a special district or other entity;

To the state auditor by October 5 of each year, a list of special districts and other entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a), no matter how formed, that failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The state auditor shall immediately notify all state agencies and boards of every special district or other entity described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) that failed to comply with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. Upon receipt of notification by the state auditor pursuant to this paragraph, a state agency or board shall withhold state grant and loan payments to every noncompliant special district or other entity described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) for the period after October 15 until further notice from the state auditor that a noncompliant district or entity has come into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The department of audit shall certify to the state auditor when a special district or other entity comes into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. The state auditor shall immediately notify all state agencies and boards of any special district or other entity that has come into compliance with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section. Any withheld state grant or loan payment shall be retained by the state agency or board in the account from which the disbursement would be made until the state agency or board receives notification from the state auditor that the special district or other entity has complied with paragraph (a)(vii) of this section, or as otherwise provided by law.

The director of the department of audit shall report on or before December 31 of each year to the governor and the legislature, financial information regarding counties, cities, towns and special districts. The information shall be obtained from the annual reports collected from the required reports in this section and shall be in a form required by the director. The annual reports and the required reports in this section shall be open for public inspection.

The director of the department of audit shall have the authority to obtain the financial and criminal background of any employee or employment applicant of the department in accordance with W.S.

7-19-106

and

7-19-201

.

The director of the department of audit shall have the authority to appoint a public funds administrator who shall serve at the pleasure of the director. The administrator shall have not less than seven (7) years of experience holding all the requirements to practice as a certified public accountant or certified internal auditor. The administrator shall assist the director in his duties to supervise books, financial accounts and financial records of all state agencies and institutions, counties, school districts and municipalities within this state.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 17; R.S. 1931, § 109-517; C.S. 1945, § 18-817; W.S. 1957, § 9-102; Laws 1974, ch. 16, § 2; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-410

; Laws 1978, ch. 44, § 1; 1980, ch. 49, § 2; 1981, ch. 60, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1989, ch. 157, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 75, §§ 1, 2; Laws 1994, ch. 29, § 1; 1995, ch. 199, § 1; 1997, ch. 178, § 1; 1998, ch. 13, § 1; 2001, ch. 199, § 1; ch. 209, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 26, §§ 1, 2; 2004, ch. 21, § 1; 2007, ch. 107, § 1; 2008, ch. 44, § 1; 2009, ch. 90, § 2; 2013 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2017 ch. 62, § 2, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 184, § 1, effective March 8, 2019; 2020 ch. 87, § 1, effective July 1, 2020; 2022 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 9, 2022; 2022 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

Cross references. —

As to examination of accounts of circuit courts, see §

5-9-150

.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2019, ch. 184 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added the last sentence in (k).

The 2007 amendment,

in (a)(v) added the last sentence; added (a)(v)(A) through (a)(v)(D); and added (m) through (n).

Laws 2007, ch. 107, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2008 amendment,

in (a)(vi), deleted “and the legislative service office” at the end, and made a stylistic change.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “W.S. 16-4-125(c)” for “W.S. 16-4-104(g)”
in (a)(iii) and
(v).

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, added the last sentence in (a)(vii); and added (viii).

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (a)(viii), substituted “2018” for “2014”; added “and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a) prior to "in this state,” in the first sentence; substituted “county clerk” for “board of county commissioners” in the first sentence; added “other specified entity” following “the county where the special district” in the first sentence; added the second sentence; added “or posting” following “The report” in the third sentence; and substituted “2017” for “2013” at the end of the last sentence.

The 2019 amendment,

added (a)(ix).

Laws 2019, ch. 184 § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (a)(ix) substituted “subparagraphs (iii)(A) through (D)” for “subparagraphs (A) through (D) of paragraph (iii).”

The 2022 amendments. —

The first 2022 amendment, by ch. 40, § 1, added the second and third sentences in (g); in (j)(i), in the first sentence, added “and state auditor,” substituted “that” for “which,” added the fourth through eighth sentences; added (j)(iii); and made related changes.

Laws 2022, ch. 40, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

The second 2022 amendment, by ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2022, in the introductory language of (a)(iii), added “, special districts and other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, added “and entities” and “or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)”; in the introductory language of (a)(v), in the first sentence, added “special” preceding “district” and “or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)”; in the introductory language of (a)(vii), substituted “counties, cities, towns and special districts and entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)” for “each county, city and town, special district and joint powers board” in the first sentence, in the last sentence, added “and entities described in W.S. 16-4-125(c) that receive funding from a municipality as defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a)” and “and other entity”; in (j)(ii), added “or other entity” following “district” throughout the subsection, in the first sentence, added “or entity described in W.S. 16 4 125(c) that receives funding from a municipality as defined by W.S. 16-4-102(a)(xiv) or other entities specified in W.S. 16-12-202(a),” substituted “that” for “which has,” and added “the process described by” in the sixth sentence.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 2009, ch. 90, § 4 provides: “It is the intent of this act to impose a fiscal year of July 1 through June 30 on all governmental entities in this state, including all agencies, boards, commissions, institutions, instrumentalities, political subdivisions and special districts, no matter how formed, unless specifically exempted or otherwise authorized by law.
The intent of this act is to repeal any noncodified provision which conflicts with the provisions of this act, including but not limited to earlier adopted government reorganization acts.
Any entity required to change its current fiscal year of operation may elect to extend its current fiscal year or shorten its current fiscal year and commence its next fiscal year on July 1, 2009 or July 1, 2010, as it finds most convenient and efficient for its circumstances.”

Laws 2022, ch. 40, § 2, provides, “All public officers who hold their position as of July 1, 2023 shall receive the training required by this act on or before July 1, 2024.”

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 9-1-508.
Prohibited acts; failure to make return; refusal to give information; hindering or obstructing examination; penalties.

A person commits a felony punishable by a fine of not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), imprisonment for not less than one (1) nor more than five (5) years, or both, if he:

Refuses to make a required return or exhibit to the director of the state department of audit;

Refuses to give or obstructs access to information required by the director;

Willfully hinders, obstructs or misleads the director in the execution of his duties;

In any manner hinders the thorough examination the director is required to make by law.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 22; R.S. 1931, § 109-522; C.S. 1945, § 18-823; W.S. 1957, § 9-108; W.S. 1977, §

9-2-417

; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-1-509.
Duty of county and district attorneys.

When requested by the director of the state department of audit, the county and prosecuting or district attorney shall aid in any investigation or matter, give legal advice, and prosecute criminal cases.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 28; R.S. 1931, § 109-528; C.S. 1945, § 18-829; W.S. 1957, § 9-113; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-421; Laws 1981, Sp. Sess., ch. 22, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 9-1-510.
Instructions to public officers; failure of public officer to obey.

The director of the state department of audit shall establish minimum training requirements for public officers. The department of audit shall promulgate rules to effectuate this paragraph. The director shall instruct public officers in the proper handling of the accounts of their offices in accordance with the minimum training requirements established by the director and provide comprehensive written materials. In lieu of directly instructing public officers, the director may develop and maintain a list of approved courses that comply with the minimum training requirements. All public officers shall receive instruction in accordance with the minimum training requirements established by the director within one (1) year of assuming office or assuming responsibility for handling the accounts of their office. The director may waive or modify the requirement for public officers to receive instruction within one (1) year of assuming office or responsibility for handling the accounts of their office if no approved courses exist in either a virtual format or within the state, or if available courses are cost prohibitive. A public officer shall handle the accounts of his office strictly in conformance with the instructions of the director or any approved course and in the manner required by law. If any public officer willfully neglects or refuses to handle his accounts in the manner required or fails to comply with the minimum training requirements established by the director within one (1) year of assuming office, the director may request the governing body with oversight over the public officer or other appropriate authority to remove the public officer or provide increased oversight. For purposes of this section, a “public officer” shall be defined as:

The person or persons directly responsible for handling the accounts of their public office; and

For entities managed by a governing body, members of the governing body with oversight over the person or persons directly responsible for handling the accounts of their public office.

Reports of books and accounts filed in the office of the director of the state department of audit as required by W.S. 9-1-507(a)(iii) shall be filed within three (3) months after the end of the fiscal year being reported, and shall be in such form and detail as the director may require. Upon a request in writing and good cause shown, the director may allow an extension of time for filing a report or such additional information as may be required.

If a report is not filed in the director’s office within the time allowed, the director may proceed to have an audit, or other oversight, as required, performed and may recover the cost of the audit or other oversight in the manner provided in W.S. 16-4-121(e).

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 33; R.S. 1931, § 109-533; C.S. 1945, § 18-834; W.S. 1957, § 9-118; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-426; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1993, ch. 75, § 1; 1994, ch. 29, § 1; 2022 ch. 40, § 1, effective March 9, 2022.

The 2022 amendment

rewrote (a), which read, “The director of the state department of audit shall instruct public officers in the proper handling of the accounts of their offices. A public officer shall handle the accounts of his office strictly in conformance with the instructions of the director. If any officer willfully neglects or refuses to handle his accounts in the manner required, the director may request those in authority to remove the officer.”

Laws 2022, ch. 40, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8 of the Wyoming Constitution. Approved March 9, 2022.

Editor’s notes. —

Laws 2022, ch. 40, § 2, provides, “All public officers who hold their position as of July 1, 2023 shall receive the training required by this act on or before July 1, 2024.”

§ 9-1-511.
Reports of examinations of public offices and institutions; reports on complaints or misconduct charges.

The director of the state department of audit shall prepare a report of each examination of public offices and institutions and he shall keep a permanent file of the reports. He shall provide a copy of reports on state agencies and institutions to the governor, the joint appropriations interim committee and the department of administration and information. Reports of other examinations shall be sent to the appropriate governing body.

The director shall file with the county clerk of the county a copy of every report on a county office or institution, school district or municipal office. Audit reports prepared for agencies by independent accounting firms and accepted in lieu of the director’s report shall be similarly filed. The reports shall be open for public inspection.

If a complaint or misconduct charge is made against any officer within the state, a copy of any report, as well as full details of the case, shall be submitted to the governor.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 34; R.S. 1931, § 109-534; C.S. 1945, § 18-835; Laws 1951, ch. 81, § 1; 1957, ch. 111, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 9-119; Laws 1973, ch. 215, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-427; Laws 1978, ch. 44, § 1; 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 29, § 3; ch. 240, § 1; 1997, ch. 31, § 2; 1999, ch. 23, § 1.

§ 9-1-512.
Reports required by law not open for public examination; exceptions; forms for reports.

The director of the state department of audit shall receive and place on file in his office all reports required by law. None of the reports, except as provided by W.S. 9-1-507(k) and the published statement of banks and public offices, are public records or open for public inspection. The state banking commissioner may furnish to the federal reserve bank and its examiners copies of all reports and information pertaining to the condition of the state bank members of the federal reserve system. He may furnish to the federal deposit insurance corporation copies of all reports and information pertaining to the condition of state banks in which the corporation is interested. The state banking commissioner may share examination and other reports with other bank supervisory agencies as authorized by W.S.

13-2-807

and

13-9-316

. The director of the state department of audit shall prescribe and distribute the forms for all reports his office is required by law to make.

History.

Laws 1925, ch. 155, § 35; R.S. 1931, § 109-535; Laws 1935, ch. 12, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 18-836; W.S. 1957, § 9-120; W.S. 1977, § 9-2-428; Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 3; 1991, ch. 240, § 1; 1997, ch. 75, § 2; 2004, ch. 21, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, inserted “as provided by W.S. 9-1-507(k) and” following “None of the reports, except.”